Nevada, session 83, AB292.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 393.110 is hereby amended to read as follows:
393.110 1. Each school district shall, in the design,
construction and alteration of school buildings and facilities [,
comply] :
(a) Comply with the applicable requirements of the Americans
with Disabilities Act of 1990, 42 U.S.C. §§ 12101 et seq., and the
-
*AB292*

– 2 –
regulations adopted pursuant thereto, including, without limitation,
the Americans with Disabilities Act Accessibility Guidelines for
Buildings and Facilities set forth in Appendix A of Part 36 of Title
28 of the Code of Federal Regulations. The requirements of this
[subsection] paragraph are not satisfied if a school district complies
solely with the Uniform Federal Accessibility Standards set forth in
Appendix A of Part 101-19.6 of Title 41 of the Code of Federal
Regulations.
(b) Include a designated space for a prekindergarten program
in each elementary school building that is used primarily for the
educational instruction of pupils and that is designed, constructed
or altered on or after July 1, 2025.
2. In a county whose population is 700,000 or more:
(a) The board of trustees of the school district shall establish a
building department for the school district.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 477.030, the board of
trustees of the school district shall regulate all matters relating to the
construction, maintenance and safety of buildings, facilities,
structures and property of the school district.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 477.030, the board of
trustees of the school district shall adopt any building, electrical or
safety codes as necessary to carry out the provisions of this
subsection.
(d) The board of trustees of the school district shall ensure that
the building department established by the board of trustees reviews
the plans, designs and specifications for the erection of new school
buildings and for the addition to or alteration of existing school
buildings and facilities.
(e) The building department established by the board of trustees
shall, in accordance with subsection 4, conduct a review of plans,
designs and specifications for the erection of new school buildings
and for the addition to or alteration of existing school buildings and
facilities.
(f) The provisions of NRS 278.585 do not apply to the school
district in its regulation of buildings, facilities, structures and
property of the school district.
3. In a county whose population is less than 700,000:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b), unless
standard plans, designs and specifications are to be used as provided
in NRS 385.125, before letting any contract or contracts for the
erection of any new school building or for any addition to or
alteration of an existing school building, the board of trustees of the
county school district shall submit the plans, designs and
specifications to, and obtain written approval of the plans, designs
and specifications by, the building department of the county or other
-
*AB292*

– 3 –
appropriate local building department in the county, and all other
local agencies or departments whose approval is necessary for the
issuance of the appropriate permit. The approval of the State Fire
Marshal is not required for any plans, designs and specifications
reviewed by a building department pursuant to this paragraph.
(b) If there is no county building department or other
appropriate local building department in the county in which the
school district is located, the board of trustees of the school district
shall enter into an agreement with the State Public Works Division
of the Department of Administration, a private certificate holder or a
local building department in another county to obtain the required
reviews of the plans, designs and specifications and to have the
required inspections conducted. The approval of the State Fire
Marshal is not required for any plans, designs and specifications
reviewed by a private certificate holder or building department
pursuant to this paragraph.
(c) A permit for construction must be issued before the school
district commences construction.
(d) The county building department or other appropriate local
building department, the State Public Works Division of the
Department of Administration or the private certificate holder, as
applicable, shall conduct inspections of all work to determine
compliance with the approved plans, designs and specifications. An
inspection of the work by the State Fire Marshal is not required if
the work is inspected by the private certificate holder or building
department.
(e) A department, agency, private certificate holder or the State
Public Works Division of the Department of Administration is
authorized to charge and collect, and the board of trustees of the
county school district is authorized to pay, a reasonable fee for:
(1) Review of the plans, designs or specifications as required
by this subsection; or
(2) The inspections conducted pursuant to this subsection.
4. In conducting reviews pursuant to this section, the State
Public Works Division of the Department of Administration,
building department or private certificate holder, as applicable, shall
verify that the plans, designs and specifications comply with:
(a) The applicable requirements of the relevant codes adopted by
this State, including, without limitation, the applicable requirements
of any relevant codes and regulations adopted by the State Fire
Marshal;
(b) The applicable requirements of the relevant codes adopted
by the local authority having jurisdiction; and
(c) All applicable requirements of the Americans with
Disabilities Act of 1990, 42 U.S.C. §§ 12101 et seq., and the
-
*AB292*

– 4 –
regulations adopted pursuant thereto, including, without limitation,
the Americans with Disabilities Act Accessibility Guidelines for
Buildings and Facilities set forth in Appendix A of Part 36 of Title
28 of the Code of Federal Regulations. The requirements of this
subsection are not satisfied if the plans, designs and specifications
comply solely with the Uniform Federal Accessibility Standards set
forth in Appendix A of Part 101-19.6 of Title 41 of the Code of
Federal Regulations.
5. No contract for any of the purposes specified in this section
made by a board of trustees of a school district contrary to the
provisions of this section is valid, nor shall any public money be
paid for erecting, adding to or altering any school building in
contravention of this section.
6. As used in this section, “private certificate holder” means a
person who, as applicable, holds a valid certification issued by the
International Code Council or its successor:
(a) To review plans, designs and specifications for the erection
of, addition to or alteration of a school building;
(b) To inspect work to ensure that the erection of, addition to or
alteration of a school building is carried out in conformance with the
relevant plans, designs and specifications; or
(c) To perform the activities described in paragraphs (a) and (b).
Sec. 2. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
H
-
*AB292*